nb: Tilleggsfunksjoner for publiseringsprogramvare: Desktop Publishing; Digital publisering; Nettpublisering; Printdesign; Annet
pt-PT: Características adicionais de software de edição: Edição eletrónica; Edição digital; Edição digital; Design de impressão; Outro
pt-BR: Recursos adicionais de software de publicação: Editoração eletrônica; Publicação digital; Publicação online; Design de impressão; Outro
tr: Ek yayınlama yazılımı özellikleri: Masaüstü yayıncılığı; Dijital yayıncılık; Çevrimiçi yayıncılık; Baskı tasarımı; Diğer
zh-TW: 附加發布軟體功能: 電腦版發布; 數位發布; 線上發布; 印刷設計; 其他
sl-SI: Dodatne funkcije programske opreme za založništvo: Namizno založništvo; Digitalno založništvo; Spletno založništvo; Oblikovanje tiska; Drugo
fi: Julkaisuohjelmiston lisäominaisuudet: Työpöytäjulkaiseminen; Digitaalinen julkaiseminen; Verkkojulkaiseminen; Painatussuunnittelu; Muu
de: Zusätzliche Funktionen der Publishing-Software: Desktop-Publishing; Digital Publishing; Online-Publishing; Druckdesign; Sonstiges
el: Πρόσθετες λειτουργίες λογισμικού έκδοσης: Ηλεκτρονική σελιδοποίηση; Ψηφιακές εκδόσεις; Διαδικτυακές εκδόσεις; Σχεδιασμός εκτυπώσεων; Άλλο
sv: Ytterligare detaljer för programvara för publicering: Desktop Publishing; Digital publicering; Onlinepublicering; Tryckdesign; Övrigt
fr: Fonctionnalités supplémentaires du logiciel d’édition: Publication assistée par ordinateur; Édition numérique; Publication en ligne; Design d’impression; Autre
hu: Kiadványszerkesztő szoftver további funkciói: Kiadványszerkesztés; Digitális kiadás; Online kiadás; Nyomdai tervezés; Egyéb
ru: Дополнительные функции программного обеспечения для редакционно-издательских работ: Компьютерная верстка; Цифровая полиграфия; Размещение в Интернете; Полиграфический дизайн; Другое
nl: Extra functies voor publicatiesoftware: Desktoppublishing; Digitaal publiceren; Online publiceren; Puntontwerp; Andere
lt-LT: Papildomos leidybos programinės įrangos funkcijos: Kompiuterinė leidyba; Skaitmeninė leidyba; Internetinė leidyba; Spaudinio dizainas; Kita
hr-HR: Dodatne značajke softvera za izdavaštvo: Stolno izdavaštvo; Digitalno izdavaštvo; Mrežno izdavaštvo; Dizajn tiska; Ostalo
da: Yderligere funktioner for udgivelsessoftware: Desktop Publishing; Digital udgivelse; Online udgivelse; Printdesign; Andet
ja: その他のパブリッシングソフトウェア機能: デスクトップパブリッシング; デジタルパブリッシング; オンラインパブリッシング; プリントデザイン; その他
pl: Dodatkowe funkcje oprogramowania do publikowania: Desktop publishing; Digital publishing; Online publishing; Projektowanie materiałów drukowanych; Inne
vi: Các tính năng phần mềm xuất bản bổ sung: Chế bản điện tử; Xuất bản kỹ thuật số; Xuất bản trực tuyến; Thiêt kê in ấn; Khác
es: Características adicionales del software de publicación: Autoedición; Edición digital; Edición online; Diseño de impresión; Otros
sk-SK: Ďalšie funkcie publikovacieho softvéru: Stolné publikovanie; Digitálne publikovanie; Online publikovanie; Dizajn tlače; Iné
zh-CN: 其他排版软件功能: 桌面排版; 数字出版; 网络出版; 印刷设计; 其他
ro-RO: Funcții suplimentare software publicare de conținut: Desktop publishing; Publicare digitală; Publicare online; Print design; Altele
it: Funzionalità aggiuntive del software di pubblicazione: Desktop publishing; Publishing digitale; Publishing online; Desig di stampa; Altro
ko: 추가 출판 소프트웨어 기능: 데스크톱 출판; 디지털 출판; 온라인 출판; 포인트 디자인; 기타
th: คุณลักษณะเพิ่มเติมของซอฟต์แวร์การเผยแพร่: สิ่งพิมพ์ที่ผลิตด้วยคอมพิวเตอร์; สิ่งพิมพ์ดิจิทัล; สิ่งพิมพ์ออนไลน์; การออกแบบสิ่งพิมพ์; อื่นๆ
en: Additional publishing software features: Desktop publishing; Digital publishing; Online publishing; Print design; Other
cs: Další vlastnosti publikačního softwaru: Desktop Publishing; Digitální publikování; Online publikování; Tiskový design; Jiné
bg-BG: Допълнителни функции на софтуера за публикуване: Публикуване на работен плот; Дигитално публикуване; Онлайн публикуване; Печатен дизайн; Други